trunk/incubator/apertium-pl-ru.ru.dix.xml
    <pardef n="метауров/ен__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ен</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ня</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ню</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ен</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нем</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>не</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ней</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ням</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нями</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нях</l>
          <r>ен<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="злыд/ень__np"> <!-- rogue; evil person -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ень</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ня</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ню</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ня</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нем</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>не</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ней</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ням</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ней</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нями</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нях</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="столиц/а__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="prp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ног/а__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="голов/а__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="столица"><i>столиц</i><par n="столиц/а__n"/></e>
    <e lm="нога"><i>ног</i><par n="ног/а__n"/></e>
    <e lm="рука"><i>рук</i><par n="ног/а__n"/></e>
    <e lm="голова"><i>голов</i><par n="голов/а__n"/></e>
